Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1704
Best value-based selection process, defined.

Best value-based selection process means a process of selecting a design-builder using price, schedule, and qualifications for evaluation factors.

Laws 2018, LB775, § 5.